Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4077.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin CRYSTAL; DOUGLAS DRIVE WATER MAIN IMPROVEMENTS.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin $15,000,000 is appropriated from the bond proceeds fund to the Public Facilities Authority for a grant to the city of Crystal to predesign, design, engineer, and construct the replacement of water main infrastructure, and associated street, sidewalk, and storm sewer improvements, along Hennepin County State-Aid Highway 102 (Douglas Drive) in the city of Crystal, from the intersection of Hennepin County State-Aid Highway 70 (Medicine Lake Road) and 29th Avenue North to Hennepin County State-Aid Highway 8 (West Broadway). new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Bond sale. new text end new text begin To provide the money appropriated in this section from the bond proceeds fund, the commissioner of management and budget shall sell and issue bonds of the state in an amount up to $15,000,000 in the manner, upon the terms, and with the effect prescribed by Minnesota Statutes, sections 16A.631 to 16A.675, and by the Minnesota Constitution, article XI, sections 4 to 7. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end